Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.377, is amended to read: 609.377 MALICIOUS PUNISHMENT OF CHILD. Subdivision 1. Malicious punishment. A parent, legal guardian, or caretaker who, by an intentional act or a series of intentional acts with respect to a child, evidences unreasonable force or cruel discipline that is excessive under the circumstances is guilty of malicious punishment of a child and may be sentenced as provided in subdivisions 2 to 6. Subd. 2. Gross misdemeanor. If the punishment results in less than substantial bodily harm, the person may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both. Subd. 3. Enhancement to a felony. Whoever violates the provisions of subdivision 2 during the time period between a previous conviction or adjudication for delinquency under this section or sections 609.221 to 609.2231, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.342 to 609.345, or 609.713, and the end of five years following discharge from sentence or disposition for that conviction or adjudication deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonmentdeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner of correctionsnew text end for not new text begin less than a year, nor new text end more than five years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and may be sentenced to payment ofnew text end a fine of $10,000, or both. Subd. 4. Felony; child under age four. If the punishment is to a child under the age of four and causes bodily harm to the head, eyes, neck, or otherwise causes multiple bruises to the body, the person deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonmentdeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections new text end for not new text begin less than a year, nor new text end more than five years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and may be sentenced to payment ofnew text end a fine of $10,000, or both. Subd. 5. Felony; substantial bodily harm. If the punishment results in substantial bodily harm, the person deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonmentdeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections new text end for not new text begin less than a year, nor new text end more than five years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and may be sentenced new text end to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. Subd. 6. Felony; great bodily harm. If the punishment results in great bodily harm, the person deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonmentdeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections new text end for not new text begin less than two years, nor new text end more than ten years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and may be sentenced new text end to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end